District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.13

Limitation on the use of a generator as a demand response generating source.

(a)

No person shall construct or operate an internal combustion engine as a demand response generating source unless the source implements, at a minimum, current best available control technology in accordance with a permit issued by the Director.

(b)

A demand response generating source shall not be classified or permitted as an emergency generator.

(c)

Nothing in this part shall prevent the Director from denying an application for or renewal of a permit for a demand response generating source to protect air quality or to encourage energy efficiency or conservation-based demand response in the District.

(d)

A person found by the Director to be in violation of this section shall be subject to the civil penalties available under §  8-101.05c.

History

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 203, 61 DCR 6767